Washington statutes.
RCW 7.05.030

International origin and general principles.

(1) In the interpretation of this chapter, regard is to be had to its international origin and to the need to promote uniformity in its application and the observance of good faith.

(2) Questions concerning matters governed by this chapter which are not expressly settled in it are to be settled in conformity with the general principles on which this chapter is based.

[ 2015 c 276 s 3.]